Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1706
Department, defined.

Department shall mean the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 26;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 203;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 79.